Maryland, session 2025, HB1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
5–602.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DISTRIBUTE” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE SHARING OF
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1398*

HOUSE BILL 1398
HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL
WITHOUT REMUNERATION OR THE EXCHANGE OF GOODS OR SERVICES.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, A PERSON MAY NOT
DISTRIBUTE HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR
FENTANYL WITHOUT THE LAWFUL AUTHORITY TO DO SO, THE USE OF WHICH
RESULTS IN THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OF ANOTHER.
(C) THIS SECTION APPLIES REGARDLESS OF WHETHER:
(1) THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER OCCURRED
AS A RESULT OF USING HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF
HEROIN OR FENTANYL BY ITSELF OR COMBINED WITH ANY COMPOUND, MIXTURE,
DILUENT, OR OTHER SUBSTANCE;
(2) THE HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR THE CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF
HEROIN OR FENTANYL IS MIXED OR COMBINED WITH ANY COMPOUND, MIXTURE,
DILUENT, OR OTHER SUBSTANCE AFTER THE VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION OCCURS; OR
(3) THE DISTRIBUTION OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR THE CHEMICAL
ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL IS MADE DIRECTLY TO THE PERSON WHO DIES
OR SUFFERS SERIOUS BODILY INJURY.
(D) IF POSSESSION OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE
OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL IS TRANSFERRED MORE THAN ONCE PRIOR TO THE
OCCURRENCE OF THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY, EACH PERSON WHO
DISTRIBUTED OR DELIVERED THE HEROIN, FENTANYL, OR THE CHEMICAL
ANALOGUE OF HEROIN OR FENTANYL SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE VIOLATED
THIS SECTION.
(E) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND,
IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY IMPOSED FOR A VIOLATION OF § 5–602 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 20
YEARS.
(F) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSECUTIVE
TO AND NOT CONCURRENT WITH ANOTHER SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF LAW.
(G) A PERSON WHO, IN GOOD FAITH, SEEKS, PROVIDES, OR ASSISTS WITH
THE PROVISION OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE FOR A PERSON EXPERIENCING A MEDICAL
EMERGENCY AFTER USING HEROIN OR FENTANYL OR A CHEMICAL ANALOGUE OF

HOUSE BILL 1398 3
HEROIN OR FENTANYL SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM CRIMINAL PROSECUTION FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IF THE EVIDENCE FOR THE CRIMINAL PROSECUTION
WAS OBTAINED SOLELY AS A RESULT OF THE PERSON SEEKING, PROVIDING, OR
ASSISTING WITH THE PROVISION OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE.
Article – Criminal Procedure
4–201.
(J) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, A PROSECUTION
OF A PERSON FOR A VIOLATION OF § 5–602.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE MAY
BE BROUGHT IN:
(1) THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURRED; OR
(2) THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY
OCCURRED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.